src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
tüttö:tüttö N_TÜTTÖ  "tyttö" ;
poikõ:poikõ N_POIKÕ  "poika" ;
alkukuu:alku#kuu N_KUU  "uusi kuu" ;
rahnopuu:rahno#puu N_KUU  "mehiläispönttö" ;
šaaripää:šaari#pää N_KUU  "pörröpää" ;
rakkopilli:rakko#pilli N_PILLI  "säkkipilli" ;
aŋkkuri:aŋkkuri N_PILLI  "ankkuri" ;
kleeveri:kleeveri N_PILLI  "apila" ;
api:api N_PILLI  "apu" ;
čerikko:čerikko N_KOTO  "kirkko" ;
koto:koto N_KOTO  "talo" ;
jano:jano N_KOTO  "jano" ;
ahjo:ahjo N_KOTO  "uuni" ;
alko:alko N_KOTO  "halko" ;
rahno:rahno N_KOTO  "mehiläispönttö" ;
alku:alku N_ALKU  "alku" ;
aisu:aisu N_ALKU  "haju" ;
salajutu:sala#jutu N_ALKU  "salaisuus" ;
rehtelkakku:rehtel#kakku N_ALKU  "lettu" ;
unilintu:uni#lintu N_ALKU  "perhonen" ;
päivä:päivä N_PÄIVÄ  "päivä" ;
itä:itä N_PÄIVÄ  "itä" ;
etelä:etelä N_PÄIVÄ  "lounas" ;
apo-piimä:apo-piimä N_PÄIVÄ  "piimä" ;
omõna:omõna N_AIKA  "omena" ;
rooppa:rooppa N_AIKA  "puuro" ;
aapa:aapa N_AIKA  "haapa" ;
aika:aika N_AIKA  "aika" ;
aita:aita N_AIKA  "aita" ;
aitta:aitta N_AIKA  "aitta" ;
akka:akka N_AIKA  "akka" ;
akkuna:akkuna N_AIKA  "ikkuna" ;
alkučirja:alku#čirja N_AIKA  "aapinen" ;
pohja:pohja N_AIKA  "pohjoinen" ;
põhja:põhja N_AIKA  "pohjoinen" ;
apila:apila N_AIKA  "apila" ;
rahka:rahka N_AIKA  "rahka" ;
araga:araga N_AIKA  "harakka" ;
ranta:ranta N_AIKA  "ranta" ;
raja:raja N_AIKA  "raja" ;
saija:saija N_AIKA  "vehnäleipä" ;
raha-massina:raha-massina N_AIKA  "lompakko" ;
štanat:štana N_AIKA-PL  "housut" ;
čeeli:čeel N_ČEELI  "kieli" ;
saari:saar N_ČEELI  "saari" ;
anči:anči N_ANČI  "hanki" ;
anõ:anõ N_ANČI  "hanhi" ;
arkaperse:arka#perse N_PERSE  "jänishousu" ;
sammal:sammal N_SAMMAL  "sammal" ;
süümin:süümi N_SÜÜMIN  "ruoka" ;
aika-inehmin:aika-inehmin N_SÜÜMIN  "aikuinen" ;
alõnõ:alõ N_ALÕNÕ  "lapanen" ;
alus:aluks N_ALUS  "purjevene" ;
ammõz:ampa N_AMMÕZ  "hammas" ;
adžgad:adžgad N_  "" ;
ahvõn:ahvõn N_  "" ;
airo:airo N_  "" ;
akkunõ:akkunõ N_  "" ;
aluz:aluz N_  "" ;
ammõz:ammõz N_  "" ;
ansambeli:ansambeli N_  "" ;
api:api N_  "" ;
astia:astia N_  "" ;
auki:auki N_  "" ;
az̕z̕a:az̕z̕a N_  "" ;
baabukõz:baabukõz N_  "" ;
boranõ:boranõ N_  "" ;
bruudõ:bruudõ N_  "" ;
bul̕bukõz:bul̕bukõz N_  "" ;
čaaju:čaaju N_  "" ;
čeeli:čeeli N_  "" ;
čello:čello N_  "" ;
čerikko:čerikko N_  "" ;
čeväd:čeväd N_  "" ;
čirjõlautoo:čirjõlautoo N_  "" ;
čiutto:čiutto N_  "" ;
čühzettää:čühzettää N_  "" ;
čälü:čälü N_  "" ;
čämmel:čämmel N_  "" ;
čärpeizegriba:čärpeizegriba N_  "" ;
čäsirätte:čäsirätte N_  "" ;
dekabr̕i:dekabr̕i N_  "" ;
dohtõri:dohtõri N_  "" ;
dovariššõ:dovariššõ N_  "" ;
dääde:dääde N_  "" ;
einemaa:einemaa N_  "" ;
emä:emä N_  "" ;
erne:erne N_  "" ;
ettsisõna:ettsisõna N_  "" ;
fevrali:fevrali N_  "" ;
fotokartočka:fotokartočka N_  "" ;
gaazapliittõ:gaazapliittõ N_  "" ;
gimnazi:gimnazi N_  "" ;
glaizõ:glaizõ N_  "" ;
grammõ:grammõ N_  "" ;
gribanikkõ:gribanikkõ N_  "" ;
haili:haili N_  "" ;
harakkõ:harakkõ N_  "" ;
hatukkõin:hatukkõin N_  "" ;
hooli:hooli N_  "" ;
iiri:iiri N_  "" ;
ikolookkõ:ikolookkõ N_  "" ;
inimin:inimin N_  "" ;
irvieinečaaju:irvieinečaaju N_  "" ;
irvi:irvi N_  "" ;
ivusõd:ivusõd N_  "" ;
jaanikukkõ:jaanikukkõ N_  "" ;
jalkõ:jalkõ N_  "" ;
javo:javo N_  "" ;
joožikkõ:joožikkõ N_  "" ;
jumalanurkkõ:jumalanurkkõ N_  "" ;
juni:juni N_  "" ;
juttu:juttu N_  "" ;
jänez:jänez N_  "" ;
järvi:järvi N_  "" ;
jõulu:jõulu N_  "" ;
kaatsõd:kaatsõd N_  "" ;
kaglõ:kaglõ N_  "" ;
kagrõ:kagrõ N_  "" ;
kala:kala N_  "" ;
kamal̕ikka:kamal̕ikka N_  "" ;
kana:kana N_  "" ;
kanfetti:kanfetti N_  "" ;
kannõl:kannõl N_  "" ;
kapussõ:kapussõ N_  "" ;
karjõ:karjõ N_  "" ;
karu:karu N_  "" ;
kasõ:kasõ N_  "" ;
katti:katti N_  "" ;
katõsõpa:katõsõpa N_  "" ;
kirstu:kirstu N_  "" ;
klaass:klaass N_  "" ;
koirõ:koir N_KOIRW  "" ;
koivu:koivu N_  "" ;
kolkku:kolkku N_  "" ;
kompjutera:kompjutera N_  "" ;
koori:koori N_  "" ;
kotko:kotko N_  "" ;
kraaskõ:kraaskõ N_  "" ;
kuha:kuha N_  "" ;
kuhni:kuhni N_  "" ;
kukko:kukko N_  "" ;
kultanokkõ:kultanokkõ N_  "" ;
kuu:kuu N_  "" ;
kvartira:kvartira N_  "" ;
kõrtõ:kõrtõ N_  "" ;
laatko:laatko N_  "" ;
lafkõ:lafkõ N_  "" ;
lahsi:lahsi N_  "" ;
laivõ:laivõ N_  "" ;
lammõz:lammõz N_  "" ;
lanttu:lanttu N_  "" ;
laukopäive:laukopäive N_  "" ;
lauta:lauta N_  "" ;
lauttõ:lauttõ N_  "" ;
leho:leho N_  "" ;
liha:liha N_  "" ;
liittsõ:liittsõ N_  "" ;
lintu:lintu N_  "" ;
litra:litra N_  "" ;
lohko:lohko N_  "" ;
lukõmin:lukõmin N_  "" ;
lumi:lumi N_  "" ;
luzikkõ:luzikkõ N_  "" ;
lõhi:lõhi N_  "" ;
lõppu:lõppu N_  "" ;
löülü:löülü N_  "" ;
maailmõ:maailmõ N_  "" ;
maa:maa N_  "" ;
maamõ:maamõ N_  "" ;
maija:maija N_  "" ;
marjõ:marjõ N_  "" ;
mašinõ:mašinõ N_  "" ;
meri:meri N_  "" ;
mettsekittsi:mettsekittsi N_  "" ;
minutti:minutti N_  "" ;
mulipää:mulipää N_  "" ;
muragõ:muragõ N_  "" ;
mussamarjõ:mussamarjõ N_  "" ;
naapõri:naapõri N_  "" ;
nagriskaaskõ:nagriskaaskõ N_  "" ;
naizikko:naizikko N_  "" ;
nenä:nenä N_  "" ;
niglõ:niglõ N_  "" ;
nisu:nisu N_  "" ;
noorikkõ:noorikkõ N_  "" ;
nuumõri:nuumõri N_  "" ;
nätsijä:nätsijä N_  "" ;
omõnpuu:omõnpuu N_  "" ;
paju:paju N_  "" ;
pappi:pappi N_  "" ;
peitto:peitto N_  "" ;
pettelikko:pettelikko N_  "" ;
pinžakka:pinžakka N_  "" ;
pojezdõ:pojezdõ N_  "" ;
porttu:porttu N_  "" ;
propkõ:propkõ N_  "" ;
puu:puu N_  "" ;
päive:päive N_  "" ;
põlto:põlto N_  "" ;
raha:raha N_  "" ;
rehtele:rehtele N_  "" ;
riittõ:riittõ N_  "" ;
rokkalintu:rokkalintu N_  "" ;
rätte:rätte N_  "" ;
samal̕otti:samal̕otti N_  "" ;
saunõ:saunõ N_  "" ;
seine:seine N_  "" ;
sentäbri:sentäbri N_  "" ;
šikripää:šikripää N_  "" ;
siltašiškõ:siltašiškõ N_  "" ;
škoulu:škoulu N_  "" ;
šokolada:šokolada N_  "" ;
soomõlain:soomõlain N_  "" ;
šoseika:šoseika N_  "" ;
stokanõ:stokanõ N_  "" ;
sukulain:sukulain N_  "" ;
šuubõ:šuubõ N_  "" ;
süntüpäive:süntüpäive N_  "" ;
sõnatüvi:sõnatüvi N_  "" ;
sõta:sõta N_  "" ;
taivõz:taivõz N_  "" ;
tara:tara N_  "" ;
telefona:telefona N_  "" ;
tila:tila N_  "" ;
tormi:tormi N_  "" ;
tunnid:tunnid N_  "" ;
tuuli:tuuli N_  "" ;
tüttö:tüttö N_  "" ;
täti:täti N_  "" ;
ukrainalain:ukrainalain N_  "" ;
urokkõ:urokkõ N_  "" ;
vad̕d̕akko:vad̕d̕akko N_  "" ;
varõz:varõz N_  "" ;
vello:vello N_  "" ;
vesi:vesi N_  "" ;
viijespäive:viijespäive N_  "" ;
villõ:villõ N_  "" ;
vokki:vokki N_  "" ;
värpö:värpö N_  "" ;
võimõ:võimõ N_  "" ;
üliškoulu:üliškoulu N_  "" ;
zanaveskad:zanaveskad N_  "" ;
äjje:äjje N_  "" ;
ärüd:ärüd N_  "" ;
õmpõlija:õmpõlija N_  "" ;
õpõn:õpõn N_  "" ;
õttsõ:õttsõ N_  "" ;
